Utah statutes.
51-9-403.   EMS share of surcharge -- Accounting.

(1)  The Division of Finance shall allocate 14% of the collected surcharge established in Section 51-9-401, but not to exceed the amount appropriated by the Legislature, to the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Grants Program Account under Section 26-8a-207.

(2)  The amount shall be recorded by the Department of Health as a dedicated credit.

